Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB29.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 6.072 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Witnesses testifying before[attending] the General Assembly,[ either house or] a[
legislative] committee, interim committee, statutory committee, subcommittee,
commission, or task force of the General Assembly, are entitled to the same
privileges and immunities, and the same compensation, as witnesses in other civil
and criminal proceedings[cases]. When summoned by the Commonwealth, they
shall be paid out of the State Treasury.
(2) Any member acting as chair[Chairmen] of a[the] committee,[committees] interim
committee, statutory committee, subcommittee, commission, or task force of the
General Assembly[Senate and House of Representatives] shall[may] administer
an[all necessary oaths] oath to any person who appears or is called to testify before
that[a] committee, interim committee, statutory committee, subcommittee,
commission, or task force of the General Assembly[ of either house].
(3) (a) The oath administered to each witness who testifies before a committee,
interim committee, statutory committee, subcommittee, commission, or task
force of the General Assembly shall follow the oath administered to a
witness in a court of law and read as follows: "Do you swear or affirm that
you will tell the truth, the whole truth, and nothing but the truth?"
(b) If a witness refuses to take the oath, then he or she shall not be permitted to
testify before the committee.
(4) An oath sworn during a previous committee, interim committee, statutory
committee, subcommittee, commission, or task force meeting shall not apply to
any future meeting of a committee, interim committee, statutory committee,
subcommittee, commission, or task force of the General Assembly.
(5) Testimony given under oath shall be subject to the penalties prescribed in KRS
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 12/18/2024 10:56 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 43
Chapter 523.
(6) All meetings of a committee, interim committee, statutory committee,
subcommittee, commission, or task force of the General Assembly shall be
recorded and transcribed.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 12/18/2024 10:56 AM Jacketed